Vermont statutes. Title 26 Professions and Occupations
Subchapter 3. Licenses

§ 5121.
Eligibility for licensure.

To be eligible for licensure as a pollution abatement facility operator, an applicant shall be at least 18 years of age; be able to read and write the English language; and demonstrate such specific education, training, experience, and examination performance as the Director may by rule require to hold the class of license sought.

The Director may waive examination for an applicant licensed or certified in good standing by a foreign jurisdiction found by the Director to enforce equivalent standards to obtain the class of license sought in this State. The applicant’s previous job description and experience in the pollution abatement field may be considered.

HISTORY:

Added

2015, No. 156

(Adj. Sess.), § 13, eff. Jan. 1, 2017;

2019, No. 178

(Adj. Sess.), § 26, eff. Oct. 1, 2020.

§ 5122.
License renewal.

A license shall be renewed every two years upon application, payment of the required fee, and proof of compliance with such continuing education or periodic reexamination requirements as the Director may by rule prescribe. Failure to comply with the provisions of this section shall result in suspension of all privileges granted to the licensee, beginning on the expiration date of the license.
(a) (1) A license shall be renewed every two years upon application, payment of the required fee, and proof of compliance with such continuing education or periodic reexamination requirements as the Director may by rule prescribe. Failure to comply with the provisions of this section shall result in suspension of all privileges granted to the licensee, beginning on the expiration date of the license.

A license that has lapsed shall be renewed upon payment of the biennial renewal fee and the late renewal penalty.

The Director may adopt rules necessary for the protection of the public to assure the Director that an applicant whose license has lapsed or who has not worked for more than three years as a pollution abatement facility operator is professionally qualified for license renewal. Conditions imposed under this subsection shall be in addition to the requirements of subsection (a) of this section.

HISTORY:

Added

2015, No. 156

(Adj. Sess.), § 13, eff. Jan. 1, 2017.

§ 5123.
Applications.

Applications for licensure and license renewal shall be on forms provided by the Director. Each application shall contain a statement under oath showing the applicant’s education, experience, and other pertinent information and shall be accompanied by the required fee.

HISTORY:

Added

2015, No. 156

(Adj. Sess.), § 13, eff. Jan. 1, 2017.

§ 5124.
Licensure generally.

The Director shall issue a license or renew a license upon payment of the fees required under this chapter to an applicant or licensee who has satisfactorily met all the requirements of this chapter.

HISTORY:

Added

2015, No. 156

(Adj. Sess.), § 13, eff. Jan. 1, 2017.

§ 5125.
Fees.

Applicants and persons regulated under this chapter shall pay those fees set forth in

3 V.S.A. § 125(b)

.

HISTORY:

Added

2015, No. 156

(Adj. Sess.), § 13, eff. Jan. 1, 2017.

§ 5126.
Unprofessional conduct.

Unprofessional conduct means the following conduct and the conduct set forth in

3 V.S.A. § 129a

committed by a licensee, an applicant, or a person who later becomes an applicant:

has made or caused to be made a false, fraudulent, or forged statement or representation in procuring or attempting to procure registration or renew a license to practice as a water treatment facility operator;

whether or not committed in this State, has been convicted of a crime related to pollution abatement or environmental compliance or a felony that evinces an unfitness to practice water treatment facility operation;

is unable to practice pollution abatement facility operation competently by reason of any cause;

has willfully or repeatedly violated or caused the violation of any of the provisions of this chapter, the terms of a permit, the Vermont Water Pollution Control Permit Regulations, or the Vermont Water Quality Standards;

is habitually intemperate or is addicted to the use of habit-forming drugs;

has a mental, emotional, or physical disability, the nature of which interferes with the ability to practice pollution abatement facility operation competently;

engages in conduct of a character likely to deceive, defraud, or harm the public;

fails to display prominently his or her pollution abatement facility operator license in the office of a facility at which he or she performs licensed activities; or

unreasonably fails to ensure proper operations of the facility.

A person shall not be liable in a civil action for damages resulting from the good faith reporting of information to the Director or the Office of Professional Regulation about alleged incompetent, unprofessional, or unlawful conduct of a pollution abatement facility operator or facility, corporation, or municipal corporation employing such person.

HISTORY:

Added

2015, No. 156

(Adj. Sess.), § 13, eff. Jan. 1, 2017.